Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2233HV (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. 311 Section 1. Section 524.601, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The business and affairs of a state bank shall be managed 3 by a board of five or more directors eighteen years of age or 4 older, a majority of whom shall be residents of the state of 5 Iowa and citizens of the United States , and at least three of 6 whom shall be residents of the state of Iowa . 7 Sec. 2. Section 524.607, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 1. The board of directors shall hold at least nine 10 regular meetings each calendar year. No more than one 11 regular meeting shall be held in any one calendar month At 12 a minimum, one regular meeting shall be held in each quarter 13 of a calendar year . Unless the articles of incorporation or 14 bylaws provide otherwise, any director may participate in 15 any meeting of the board of directors through the use of any 16 means of communication by which all directors participating 17 may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A 18 director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to 19 be present at the meeting. 20